glossing/lexicons/verb_rules.lexc
LEXICON V-TV-NEUT

! LEXICON V-TV-NEUT-AOR == аорист неимперфективный

! 1SG.O
! @R.VPR.nil@%-2%&3SG%.S%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.nil@%>и # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%-TH%-2%&3SG%.S%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}гъи # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%-2PL%.S%&O%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
! @R.VPR.nil@%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.nil@%>и # ;
! @R.VPR.nil@%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}гъи # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%-1SG%.O:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}гым # ;

! 1PL.O
@R.VPR.nil@%-1PL%.O%-TH%-2%&3SG.S:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}ткугъи # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%-1PL%.O%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}ткутык # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%-1PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}мык # ;
! @R.VPR.ne@%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}мык # ;

! 2SG.O
@R.VPR.t@%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;
@R.VPR.myt@%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;
! @R.VPR.ne@%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;

! 2PL.O
@R.VPR.t@%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
@R.VPR.myt@%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
! @R.VPR.ne@%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}тык # ;

! 3SG.O
@R.VPR.t@%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}н # ;
@R.VPR.t@%-TH%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н # ;
@R.VPR.myt@%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{ы%}н # ;
@R.VPR.myt@%-TH%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}н # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%-TH%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%-2PL%.A%.3%.O:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}ткы # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%-3SG%.A%.3%.O%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}нин # ;
! @R.VPR.ne@%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}н # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%-TH%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н # ;

! 3PL.O
@R.VPR.t@%-3SG%.O%-PL:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.myt@%-3SG%.O%-PL:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%-3SG%.O%-PL:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%-2PL%.A%.3%.O:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}ткы # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%-3SG%.A%.3%.O-3SG%.O%-PL:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}нин%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%-3SG%.O%-PL:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т # ;


! LEXICON V-TV-NEUT-FUT == будущее неимперфективное

! 1SG.O
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-TH%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%} # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-FUT%-2PL%.S%&O%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}нтык # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-TH%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%} # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%[%+fut%]%-1SG%.O:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}гым # ;

! 1PL.O
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-1PL%.O%-TH:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}ткугъ%{Æ%} # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-1PL%.O%-FUT%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}ткунтык # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%[%+fut%]%-1PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}мык # ;
! @R.VPR.ne@%[%+fut%]%-1PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}мык # ;

! 2SG.O
@R.VPR.t@%[%+fut%]%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;
@R.VPR.myt@%[%+fut%]%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%[%+fut%]%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;
! @R.VPR.ne@%[%+fut%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;

! 2PL.O
@R.VPR.t@%[%+fut%]%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
@R.VPR.myt@%[%+fut%]%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%[%+fut%]%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
! @R.VPR.ne@%[%+fut%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}тык # ;

! 3SG.O
@R.VPR.t@%[%+fut%]%-FUT%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}ӈын # ;
@R.VPR.myt@%[%+fut%]%-FUT%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{ы%}ӈын # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-FUT%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}ӈын # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-FUT%-2PL%.A%.3%.O:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}ӈыткы # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-FUT%-3SG%.A%.3%.O%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}гнин # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%[%+fut%]%-FUT%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}ӈын # ;

! 3PL.O
@R.VPR.t@%[%+fut%]%-FUT%-3SG%.O%.PL:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}ӈын%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.myt@%[%+fut%]%-FUT%-3SG%.O%.PL:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{ы%}ӈын%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-FUT%-3SG%.O%.PL:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}ӈын%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-FUT%-2PL%.A%.3%.O:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}ӈыткы # ;
@R.VPR.nil@%[%+fut%]%-FUT%-3SG%.A%.3%.O%-3SG%.O%.PL:@R.VPR.nil@%>%{ы%}гнин%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.ne@%[%+fut%]%-FUT%-3SG%.O%.PL:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}ӈын%{Æ%}т # ;


! LEXICON V-TV-NEUT-INTN == императив неимперфективный

! 1SG.O
@R.VPR.q@%-IRR%-2%&3SG%.S%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}ги # ;
@R.VPR.q@%-2PL%.S%&O%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
! @R.VPR.q@%-IRR%-2PL%.S%&O%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}гытык # ;
! @R.VPR.n@%-IRR%.2%&3SG%.S%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}н # ;
@R.VPR.n@%-TH%-IRR%.2%&3SG%.S%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н # ;
@R.VPR.yn@%-1SG%.O:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}гым # ;

! 1PL.O
@R.VPR.q@%-1PL%.O%-IRR%-2%&3SG%.S:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}ткуги # ;
@R.VPR.q@%-1PL%.O%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}ткутык # ;
@R.VPR.yn@%-1PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}мык # ;
! @R.VPR.yn@%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}мык # ;

! 2SG.O
@R.VPR.m@%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;
@R.VPR.myn@%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;
@R.VPR.yn@%-2SG%.O:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;
! @R.VPR.yn@%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;

! 2PL.O
@R.VPR.m@%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
@R.VPR.myn@%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
@R.VPR.yn@%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
! @R.VPR.yn@%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}тык # ;

! 3SG.O
@R.VPR.m@%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}н # ;
@R.VPR.m@%-TH%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н # ;
@R.VPR.myn@%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}н # ;
@R.VPR.myn@%-TH%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н # ;
@R.VPR.q@%-IRR%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}гын # ;
@R.VPR.q@%-IRR%-2PL%.A%.3%.O:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}гыткы # ;
@R.VPR.n@%-3SG%.A%.3%.O%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}нин # ;
! @R.VPR.yn@%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}ӈын # ;
@R.VPR.yn@%-TH%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н # ;

! 3PL.O
@R.VPR.m@%-3SG%.O%-PL:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.myn@%-3SG%.O%-PL:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.q@%-IRR%-3SG%.O%-PL:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}гын%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.q@%-IRR%-2PL%.A%.3%.O:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}гыткы # ;
@R.VPR.n@%-3SG%.A%.3%.O%-3SG%.O%-PL:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}нин%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.yn@%-3SG%.O%-PL:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т # ;


! LEXICON V-TV-NEUT-COND == кондиционал неимперфективный

! 1SG.O
! @R.VPR.q@%[%+cond%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}ги # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-IRR%.2%&3SG%.S%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}н # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-TH%-IRR%.2%&3SG%.S%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н # ;
! @R.VPR.q@%[%+cond%]%<a_pl2%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-2PL%.S%&O%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
! @R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-IRR%.2%&3SG%.S%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}н # ;
! @R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-TH%-IRR%.2%&3SG%.S%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-IRR%.2%&3SG%.S%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}н # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-TH%-IRR%.2%&3SG%.S%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н # ;
! @R.VPR.yn@%[%+cond%]%-1SG%.O:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}гым # ;
@R.VPR.nen@%[%+cond%]%-1SG%.O:@R.VPR.nen@%>%{ы%}гым # ;

! 1PL.O
! @R.VPR.q@%[%+cond%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}ткун # ;
! @R.VPR.q@%[%+cond%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}ткугъ%{Æ%}н # ;
! @R.VPR.q@%[%+cond%]%<a_pl2%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}ткутык # ;
! @R.VPR.yn@%[%+cond%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}мык # ;
! @R.VPR.yn@%[%+cond%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}мык # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-1PL%.O%-IRR%.2%&3SG%.S:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}ткун # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-1PL%.O%-TH%-IRR%.2%&3SG%.S:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}ткугъ%{Æ%}н # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-1PL%.O%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}ткутык # ;
@R.VPR.nen@%[%+cond%]%-1PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.nen@%>%{ы%}мык # ;

! 2SG.O
! @R.VPR.m@%[%+cond%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;
! @R.VPR.myn@%[%+cond%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;
! @R.VPR.yn@%[%+cond%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;
! @R.VPR.yn@%[%+cond%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;
@R.VPR.t@%[%+cond%]%-2SG.O:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}гыт # ; !!! FIXME
@R.VPR.myn@%[%+cond%]%-2SG.O:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;
@R.VPR.nen@%[%+cond%]%-2SG.O:@R.VPR.nen@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;
! @R.VPR.ne@%[%+cond%]%-2SG.O:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}гыт # ;

! 2PL.O
! @R.VPR.m@%[%+cond%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
! @R.VPR.myn@%[%+cond%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
! @R.VPR.yn@%[%+cond%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
! @R.VPR.yn@%[%+cond%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
@R.VPR.t@%[%+cond%]%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
@R.VPR.myn@%[%+cond%]%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
@R.VPR.nen@%[%+cond%]%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.nen@%>%{ы%}тык # ;
! @R.VPR.ne@%[%+cond%]%-2PL%.S%&O:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}тык # ;

! 3SG.O
! @R.VPR.m@%[%+cond%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}н # ;
! @R.VPR.m@%[%+cond%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н # ;
! @R.VPR.myn@%[%+cond%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}н # ;
! @R.VPR.myn@%[%+cond%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н # ;
! @R.VPR.q@%[%+cond%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}гын # ;
! @R.VPR.q@%[%+cond%]%<a_pl2%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}гыткы # ;
! @R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}нин # ;
! @R.VPR.yn@%[%+cond%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}ӈын # ;
! @R.VPR.yn@%[%+cond%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}ӈын # ;
@R.VPR.t@%[%+cond%]%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}н # ;
@R.VPR.t@%[%+cond%]%-TH%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н # ;
@R.VPR.myn@%[%+cond%]%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}н # ;
@R.VPR.myn@%[%+cond%]%-TH%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}н # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-TH%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-2PL%.A%.3%.O:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}ткы # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-3SG%.A%.3%.O%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}нин # ;
@R.VPR.nen@%[%+cond%]%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.nen@%>%{ы%}н # ;
@R.VPR.nen@%[%+cond%]%-TH%-3SG%.O:@R.VPR.nen@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н # ;
! 3PL.O
! @R.VPR.m@%[%+cond%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т # ;
! @R.VPR.myn@%[%+cond%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т # ;
! @R.VPR.q@%[%+cond%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}гын%{Æ%}т # ;
! @R.VPR.q@%[%+cond%]%<a_pl2%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}гыткы # ;
! @R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}нин%{Æ%}т # ;
! @R.VPR.yn@%[%+cond%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.t@%[%+cond%]%-3SG%.O%-PL:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.myn@%[%+cond%]%-3SG%.O%-PL:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-3SG%.O%-PL:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т # ; ! other
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%2PL%.A%.3%.O:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}ткы # ;
@R.VPR.n@%[%+cond%]%-3SG%.A%.3%.O%-3SG%.O%-PL:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}нин%{Æ%}т # ;
@R.VPR.nen@%[%+cond%]%-3SG%.O%-PL:@R.VPR.nen@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т # ;
